Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-919
Programs; administered independent of welfare assistance programs.

All programs under the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act shall be separate and administered independent of any welfare assistance program.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 19;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 4.